Maryland, session 2025, SB1000.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–1E–07.
(J) (1) A SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE ISSUED A LICENSE
UNDER § 9–1E–06(A)(2)(II) OF THIS SUBTITLE MAY SUBMIT A WRITTEN REQUEST TO
THE COMMISSION TO RELOCATE A CLASS B SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY GRANT A REQUEST SUBMITTED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION ONLY IF:
(I) THE SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE WAS
ORIGINALLY ISSUED A CLASS B SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSE ON OR
BEFORE SEPTEMBER 30, 2023; AND
(II) THE NEW LOCATION FOR THE SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY:
1. IS WITHIN THE SAME COUNTY; AND
2. COMPLIES WITH THE LOCATION REQUIREMENTS
UNDER § 9–1E–06 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
3. SUBJECT TO § 9–1E–15(Q) OF THIS SUBTITLE, IS
APPROVED BY THE SPORTS WAGERING APPLICATION REVIEW COMMISSION.
9–1E–09.
(d) (1) (I) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, a sports wagering
facility licensee may contract with any other sports wagering facility licensee to provide
sports wagering services on behalf of the licensee at a location where the licensee is
authorized to accept wagers on sporting events.

SENATE BILL 1000 3
(II) A CLASS A SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE THAT
PROVIDES SPORTS WAGERING SERVICES ON BEHALF OF A CLASS B SPORTS
WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE:
1. MAY UTILIZE THE CLASS A SPORTS WAGERING
FACILITY’S BRANDING AND LOYALTY REWARDS PROGRAMS AT THE CLASS B SPORTS
WAGERING FACILITY ON BEHALF OF WHICH IT IS PROVIDING SPORTS WAGERING
SERVICES; BUT
2. MAY NOT ALLOW AN INDIVIDUAL TO UTILIZE THE
ACCOUNT WALLET THAT THE INDIVIDUAL MAINTAINS WITH THE CLASS A SPORTS
WAGERING FACILITY WHEN PLACING WAGERS WITH THE CLASS B SPORTS WAGERING
LICENSEE.
(III) SUBJECT TO THE APPROVAL OF A CLASS A SPORTS
WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE, A CLASS B SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE
THAT RECEIVES SPORTS WAGERING SERVICES FROM A CLASS A SPORTS WAGERING
FACILITY LICENSEE MAY UTILIZE AND MARKET THE CLASS A SPORTS WAGERING
FACILITY LICENSEE’S BRANDING AND LOYALTY REWARDS PROGRAMS IN THE SAME
MANNER AS THE CLASS A SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE.
(2) If a sports wagering licensee authorized to accept wagers at a stadium
under subsection (a)(1)(iii) of this section contracts with a video lottery operator, or an
affiliate or a subsidiary of that video lottery operator, to provide sports wagering services at
the stadium, the licensee may contract only with a video lottery operator, or an affiliate or a
subsidiary of that video lottery operator, that operates a video lottery facility located in the
same county as the stadium.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.